District of Columbia statutes.
47-4002

Establishment of the Public Fund for Drug Prevention and Children at Risk; duties.

(a)

There is established a Public Fund for Drug Prevention and Children at Risk.

(b)

The Children and Youth Investment Trust Corporation (“CYITC”) shall receive, as a grant, all monies that are generated by the tax check-off system established in § 47-1812.11b. The fund shall be administered by the CYITC and shall be used to support purposes consistent with the stated purpose of the fund. The CYITC shall submit an annual financial report to the Mayor and Council of the District of Columbia no later than March 1st of each year.

(c)

The CYITC shall publicize the availability of a tax check-off for drug prevention and children at risk. The Mayor shall assist the Fund to insure public education regarding the tax check-off and District taxpayer participation in the tax check-off.

(d)

The CYITC shall take any necessary step to encourage the federal government to match the funds generated through the tax check-off.

(e)

The CYITC may recommend other means to generate funds for drug prevention and children at risk.

(f)

The CYITC shall encourage collaborative efforts and foster a public-private partnership in the development of drug prevention and children at risk programs.

(g)

The CYITC shall advise the Mayor and the Council on action needed to insure effective programming for drug prevention and children at risk in the District.

(h)

The funds generated through the tax check-off shall be invested by CYITC in bonds, treasury notes, other evidences of indebtedness of the United States, or federally insured commercial banks of the United States.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-246, § 3, 38 DCR 371
Nov. 20, 1993, D.C. Law 10-56, § 10, 40 DCR 7222
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-236, § 2(e), 46 DCR 660
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5010(a), 55 DCR 7598
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 219(b), 59 DCR 6190
Income and franchise taxes, voluntary tax check-off for donation to Fund, see § 47-1812.11b.
This section is referenced in § 47-1812.11b and § 47-4001.
1981 Ed., § 47-4002.
D.C. Law 17-219 rewrote subsec. (b); in subsecs. (c) to (g), substituted “The CYITC” for “The Fund”; and, in subsec. (h), substituted “by CYITC” for “by the Fund”. Prior to amendment, subsec. (b) read as follows: “(b) The Fund shall distribute the funds that are generated by the tax check-off system established in § 47-1812.11b. By April 1, 1992, the Fund shall publish guidelines by which a District nonprofit organization or government agency may apply for funds. Funds shall be distributed on an annual basis as determined by the Fund. By September 1, 1992, the Fund shall publish an estimated projection of funds generated by the tax check-off based on the income tax returns filed by April 15, 1992. The Fund shall submit an annual financial report to the Mayor and Council of the District of Columbia (’Council’) no later than March 1st of each year.”
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 deleted “that are in compliance with § 2-311.01 et seq.” at the end of (h).
Short title: Section 5009 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle E of title V of the act may be cited as the “Support for At-Risk Youth Act of 2008”.